Connecticut, session 2026, HB05038.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section, and
sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act: (1) "Consumer" means an individual
who is a resident of the state; (2) "bid-ask format" means a format in
which parties submit offers to buy positions on a prediction market
platform at a specific price or range of prices and offers to sell positions
at a specific price or range of prices, with market prices determined
through the matching of these offers; (3) "prediction market platform"
means any platform or service that provides consumers with the ability
to open speculative positions on the outcomes of future events; and (4)
"prediction market" means any system that allows consumers to open a
speculative position on the outcome of future events, in a bid-ask
format, regardless of the mechanisms or structures used for opening
speculative positions on future events, but does not include:
(A) Sports wagering, as defined in subdivision (34) of section 12-850
of the general statutes and solely regulated pursuant to chapter 229b of
the general statutes;
LCO No. 652 1 of 5

Governor's Bill No. 5038
(B) Online casino gaming, as defined in subdivision (26) of section 12-
850 of the general statutes and solely regulated pursuant to chapter 229b
of the general statutes,
(C) Internet games, as defined in subdivision (13) of section 12-850 of
the general statutes and solely regulated pursuant to chapter 229b of the
general statutes, or
(D) The purchase or sale of bid-asks based upon the continuous
fluctuation of a security price, commodity value, or interest rate that
correlates with traditional market prices or broad economic measures.
(b) No prediction market platform provider shall allow any consumer
under the age of twenty-one years to register or to open any speculative
position on a prediction market on such provider's platform.
(c) Any prediction market platform provided in the state shall
develop and implement a system that:
(1) Verifies that a consumer with an account for such platform is
twenty-one years of age or older and is physically present in the state
when placing a wager before such individual is permitted to open an
account and use the platform; and
(2) Provides a voluntary self-exclusion process under which a
consumer may (A) exclude himself or herself from establishing an
account, (B) exclude himself or herself from submitting offers to buy or
sell positions, or (C) limit the amount such consumer may spend using
such an account.
(d) If a prediction market platform provider has inadvertently
permitted a consumer under the age of twenty-one to use the provider's
platform and such provider discovers the error, the provider shall (1)
immediately suspend such consumer's account, (2) close all positions on
that account, (3) pay out to the consumer any funds in the account, and
(4) prohibit the consumer from further use of the provider's platform
LCO No. 652 2 of 5

Governor's Bill No. 5038
until such consumer has attained the age of twenty-one.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) (a) All advertisements for a
prediction market platform provider shall state that consumers shall be
twenty-one years of age or older to participate in the type of bid-ask
wagering advertised, marketed or promoted. If a direct or targeted
advertisement or promotion is sent to a consumer, including, but not
limited to, by electronic mail or text message, such advertisement shall
include a clear and conspicuous Internet link that allows the recipient to
unsubscribe by clicking on one link.
(b) No prediction market platform provider shall publish or cause to
be published any advertisement that:
(1) Is aimed exclusively or primarily at consumers under twenty-one
years of age or at college campuses;
(2) Directly advertises, targets or promotes prediction market bid-ask
wagering to specific consumers, rather than a general audience, who are
excluded pursuant to a self-exclusion process as described in
subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 1 of this act, through methods,
including, but not limited to, electronic mail, telephone calls, text
messages, direct messaging applications, mail and social media;
(3) Contains images, symbols, celebrity or entertainer endorsements
or language designed to appeal specifically to those under twenty-one
years of age;
(4) Contains inaccurate or misleading information that would
reasonably be expected to confuse and mislead consumers in order to
induce them to engage in prediction market platforms;
(5) Is published, aired, displayed or disseminated to a media outlet
or on social media, that appeals primarily to consumers under twenty-
one years or age; or
(6) Is placed before any audience where the majority of the viewers
LCO No. 652 3 of 5

Governor's Bill No. 5038
or participants is presumed to be under twenty-one years of age.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) Any prediction market platform
provider who violates any provision of section 1 or 2 of this act, or any
rule, regulation or order promulgated pursuant to this section and
sections 1, 2 and 4 of this act, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to
exceed ten thousand dollars assessed by the Attorney General for each
violation. If the Attorney General determines that such provider has
engaged in a persistent course of conduct in violation of this section, the
Attorney General may impose a civil penalty not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars for each violation.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) The Department of Consumer
Protection shall adopt regulations in accordance with chapter 54 of the
general statutes to implement the provisions of sections 1 to 3, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 5. (Effective July 1, 2027) To the extent any provision of sections 1
to 4, inclusive, of this act are determined by a court of competent
jurisdiction to be preempted by conflicting federal law, such provision
shall not be in force and the applicable provisions of federal law shall
apply.
Sec. 6. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of the Department
of Consumer Protection, in consultation with the office of the Attorney
General, the Mohegan Tribe, and the Mashantucket Pequot Tribe, shall
conduct a study concerning the effects of prediction market platforms
on the residents of this state including, but not limited to, the:
(1) Use of prediction market platforms by persons under the age of
100 twenty-one;
101 (2) Advertisement of prediction market platforms to persons under
102 the age of twenty-one;
103 (3) Effects of prediction market platforms on problem gambling in
LCO No. 652 4 of 5

Governor's Bill No. 5038
104 this state;
105 (4) Most frequently placed speculative positions on prediction
106 market platforms by persons in this state;
107 (5) Effects of prediction markets on revenue collected by the master
108 wagering licensees; and
109 (6) Effects of prediction markets on any payments to the state by the
110 master wagering licensees.
111 (b) Not later than February 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Consumer
112 Protection shall file a report on the study and recommendations, in
113 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
114 with the Governor, the Office of Policy and Management, and the joint
115 standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
116 matters relating to general law.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 4 July 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 5 July 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 New section